Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2798.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of Chapter 34-8 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island
Coordinate System" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 34-8
Rhode Island Coordinate System
CHAPTER 34-8
RHODE ISLAND STATE PLANE COORDINATE SYSTEM
SECTION 2. Sections 34-8-1, 34-8-2, 34-8-3, 34-8-7, 34-8-9 and 34-8-10 of the General
Laws in Chapter 34-8 entitled "Rhode Island Coordinate System" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
34-8-1. Adoption of ocean and geodetic survey systems. Adoption of the national
geodetic survey’s state plane coordinate systems.
The two (2) systems Rhode Island shall adopt the most recent system of plane coordinates
which have, known as the State Plane Coordinate System, that has been established by the national
ocean/national geodetic survey, or its successors, for defining and stating the geographic positions
or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the state are hereafter to be known and
designated State of Rhode Island as the “Rhode Island State Plane Coordinate System.”
Previous versions of these systems include the “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927”
and the “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983”.
34-8-2. Use of term in documents. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Board” means the board of registration for professional land surveyors as established
by chapter 8.1 of title 5.
(2) “National Geodetic Survey” or “NGS” means the subdivision of NOAA’s National
Ocean Service, or its successors, which provides the framework for all positioning activities in the
US.
(3) “NOAA” means the National Oceanic Atmospheric Administration, of the US
Department of Commerce.
(4) “National Spatial Reference System” or “NSRS” means a consistent coordinate system
maintained by the NGS to determine latitude, longitude, height, scale, gravity, and orientation
through the U.S.
(5) “Rhode Island state plane coordinate system” or “RISPCS” means the most recent
system of plane coordinates known as the “State Plane Coordinate System” established by the
National Geodetic Survey, based on the National Spatial Reference System, for defining and stating
the geographic positions or locations of points within the State of Rhode Island. The terms “Rhode
Island coordinate system” and “Rhode Island plane coordinate system” are synonymous with the
term “Rhode Island state plane coordinate system.”
(6) Prior versions of the “Rhode Island coordinate systems,” collectively referred to as
“legacy systems” are defined as:
(i) “The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927” means a transverse Mercator projection
of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich, on which
meridian the scale is set at one part in one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) too small. The origin
of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41°
05′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.
(ii) “The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983” means a transverse Mercator projection
of the North American datum of 1983 having a central meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich, on
which meridian the scale is set at one part in one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) too small. The
origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich and the parallel
41° 05′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 100,000 meters, and y = 0 meters.
(iii) The use of the term “Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927” or “Rhode Island
coordinate system of 1983” on any map, report of survey, or other document, shall be limited to
coordinates based on the Rhode Island coordinate system as defined in this chapter.
(7) “State plane coordinate system” means the most recent system of plane coordinates
established by the National Geodetic Survey, based on the National Spatial Reference System, for
LC005443 - Page 2 of 6

defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points within the United States.
34-8-3. Location of point by coordinates.
(a) The plane coordinate values for coordinates of a point on the earth’s surface, to be used
to express in expressing the geographic position or location of such the point on the Rhode Island
state plane coordinate system, shall consist of two (2) distances, expressed in:
(1) Meters and decimals of a meter, or international feet and decimals of an international
foot when using the Rhode Island state plane coordinate system;
(2) Meters and decimals of a meter when using the Rhode Island coordinate system of
1983; or
(3) U. S. survey feet and decimals of a survey foot when using the Rhode Island coordinate
system of 1927, and expressed in meters and decimals of a meter when using the Rhode Island
coordinate system of 1983.
(b) One of these the distances described in subsection (a) of this section, to be known as
the “east or x-coordinate”, shall give the position in an east and west direction distance east of the
y-axis; the other distance, to be known as the “north or y-coordinate”, shall give the position in a
north and south direction distance north of the x-axis. These coordinates shall be made to depend
upon and conform to plane rectangular coordinate values for the monumented points of the North
American horizontal geodetic control network tied to the NSRS as published by the national ocean
survey/national geodetic survey or its successors, and whose plane coordinates have been computed
on the systems defined in this chapter. Any such station may be used for establishing a survey
connection to either Rhode Island coordinate system set forth in § 34-8-1 of this chapter.
34-8-7. Reliance on system not required — Describing location of survey system or
land boundary corner.
(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall require any purchaser or mortgagee of real
property to rely wholly on a land description, any part of which depends exclusively upon either
Rhode Island coordinate system.
(b) For purposes of describing the location of any survey station or land boundary corner
in the state it shall be considered a complete, legal, and satisfactory description of such location to
give the position of the survey station or land boundary corner on the system of plane coordinates
defined in this chapter. Coordinates based on any Rhode Island coordinate system defined in § 34-
8-2, purporting to define the position of a point on a land boundary, presented to be recorded in any
public land records or deed records shall conform with current standards and guidelines published
by NGS and shall be accompanied by a specific statement as to their basis and a description of the
survey method used to determine them on the record plat or description of the survey. Such
LC005443 - Page 3 of 6

coordinate values shall not supersede the board of registration for professional land surveyors’ rules
for procedural and technical standards, as promulgated by the board through regulation, for the
actual establishment and location of the purported boundary.
34-8-9. Use of coordinate systems.
(a) The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927 may be was used up to and including
December 31, 1989, but shall not be used thereafter.
(b) The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983 may be used up to and including
December 31, 1989, and shall be the exclusive Rhode Island coordinate system thereafter. the
official release of the State Plane Coordinate System 2022 by the National Geodetic Survey.
(c) The Rhode Island state plane coordinate system shall be the exclusive Rhode Island
coordinate system after the official release of the State Plane Coordinate System 2022 by the
National Geodetic Survey.
34-8-10. Meter-to-foot conversion.
(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the international foot shall be used for all foot distances
and coordinates unless the distances or coordinates are tied to one of the legacy systems defined in
§ 34-8-2.
(1) One international foot equals .3048 meter exactly.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, and for purposes of conversion between the two (2)
systems set forth in § 34-8-1 of this chapter legacy systems defined in § 34-8-2, one meter equals
3.2808-⅓ survey feet.
SECTION 3. Sections 34-8-4 and 34-8-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-8 entitled
"Rhode Island Coordinate System" are hereby repealed.
34-8-4. Technical definition of systems — Origin of coordinates.
(a) For purposes of more precisely defining the Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927,
the following definition by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey is adopted:
The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1927 is a transverse Mercator projection of the
Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich, on which meridian
the scale is set at one part in one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) too small. The origin of
coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41° 05′
north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.
(b) For the purposes of more precisely defining the Rhode Island coordinate system of
1983, the following definition by the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey is adopted:
The Rhode Island coordinate system of 1983 is a transverse Mercator projection of the
North American datum of 1983 having a central meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich, on which
LC005443 - Page 4 of 6

meridian the scale is set at one part in one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) too small. The origin
of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 71° 30′ west of Greenwich and the parallel 41°
05′ north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 100,000 meters, and y = 100,000 meters,
and y = 0 meters.
34-8-6. Proximity to established station required for use of coordinates in public
records.
No coordinates based on either Rhode Island coordinate system, purporting to define the
position of a point on land boundary, shall be presented to be recorded in any public land records
or deed records unless such point is within one kilometer of a monumented horizontal control
station and unless minimum THIRD ORDER — class II procedures are used in conformity with
the standards of accuracy and specifications prepared and published by the federal geodetic control
committee established in conformity with the standards of accuracy and specifications for first —
or second-order geodetic surveying as prepared and published by the federal geodetic control
committee (FGCC) of the United States department of commerce. Standards and specifications of
the FGCC or its successor in force on date of the survey shall apply. The publishing of the existing
control stations, or the acceptance with intent to publish the newly established control stations, by
the national ocean survey/national geodetic survey will constitute evidence of adherence to the
FGCC specifications. Above limitations may be modified by the Rhode Island department of
transportation land surveying section to meet local conditions.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005443
========
LC005443 - Page 5 of 6